Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
79-1320
State Educational
Telecommunications Fund; created; use; investment.

The
State Educational Telecommunications Fund is created. The fund shall be used
by the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission for the purposes
of carrying out the provisions of the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications
Act, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State Educational Telecommunications Fund shall
consist of such sums as the Legislature may appropriate. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 1963, c. 467, § 1, p. 1496;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 91, p. 2402;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 92;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-2107;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 976;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 60.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.